Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2212
Treasurer's books; inspection.

The cash book, register and retained receipts of every such treasurer shall at all times be open to the inspection of any person in whose name any warrants are registered and unpaid.

Laws 1871, § 10, p. 115;

R.S.1913, § 6651;

C.S.1922, § 6182;

C.S.1929, § 77-2410;

R.S.1943, § 77-2212.